North Carolina, session 2025, HB852.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 67-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 67-1. Liability for injury to livestock or fowls.livestock, fowls, domestic animals, or
persons; definition of at large.
(a) If any dog, not being at the time on the premises of the owner or person having charge
thereof, dog at large shall kill or injure any livestock or fowls, livestock, fowls, domestic animals,
or persons, the owner or person having such dog in charge shall be liable for damages sustained
by the injury, killing, or maiming of any livestock, livestock, fowl, domestic animals, or persons
and costs of suit.
(b) As used in this Chapter, the term "at large" refers to a dog not under the reasonable,
physical control of an owner or some other person by the owner's permission, including, but not
limited to, instances of a dog escaping an inadequately built or maintained outdoor enclosure, a
dog wandering off the premises of an owner unaccompanied, a person walking a dog off leash in
public and relying on verbal commands, a person using a leash that is too long to allow for
sufficient control to prevent or end an attack, and a person walking a dog with a restraint system
that cannot be managed by the person having such dog in charge. This term "at large" shall not
apply to (i) a dog being used by a law enforcement officer to carry out the law enforcement
officer's official duties and (ii) a dog actively being used in a lawful hunt."
*H852-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 67-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 67-12. Permitting dogs to run at large at night; large; penalty; liability for damage.
No person shall allow his dog over six months old to run at large in the nighttime
unaccompanied bythe owner or by some member of the owner's family, or some other person by
the owner's permission. at large. Any person intentionally, knowingly, and willfully violating
this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and shall also be liable in damages to any
person injured or suffering loss to his property or chattels."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to actions
and proceedings brought or pending on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 852-First Edition